ko: 송진 경도: 엑스트라 하드; 엑스트라 소프트; 하드; 미디엄; 소프트; 기타
nb: Harpikshardhet: Ekstra hard; Ekstra myk; Hard; Medium; Myk; Annet
th: ความแข็งของเรซิน: แข็งพิเศษ; นุ่มพิเศษ; แข็ง; ปานกลาง; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
it: Durezza della colofonia: Extra dura; Extra morbida; Dura; Media; Morbida; Altro
lt-LT: Kanifolijos kietumas: Ypač kieta; Ypač minkšta; Kieta; Vidutinė; Minkšta; Kita
de: Kolophoniumhärte: Extra hart; Extra weich; Hart; Mittel; Weich; Sonstige
fr: Dureté de la colophane: Extra-dure; Extra-douce; Dure; Moyenne; Douce; Autre
zh-CN: 松香硬度: 超硬; 超软; 硬; 中; 软; 其他
vi: Độ cứng của nhựa thông: Siêu cứng; Siêu mềm; Cứng; Trung bình; Mềm; Khác
ro-RO: Duritatea sacâzului: Foarte dur; Foarte moale; Dur; Mediu; Moale; Altele
hu: Gyanta keménysége: Különösen kemény; Különösen puha; Kemény; Közepes; Puha; Egyéb
bg-BG: Твърдост на колофона: Изключително твърд; Изключително мек; Твърд; Среден; Мек; Друго
sl-SI: Trdota kolofonije: Zelo trda; Zelo mehka; Trda; Srednja; Mehka; Drugo
zh-TW: 松香硬度: 極硬; 極軟; 硬; 中; 軟; 其他
sk-SK: Tvrdosť kolofónie: Extra tvrdá; Extra mäkká; Tvrdá; Stredná; Mäkká; Iné
pt-BR: Breu dureza: Extradura; Extramacia; Dura; Média; Macia; Outro
en: Rosin hardness: Extra-hard; Extra-soft; Hard; Medium; Soft; Other
hr-HR: Tvrdoća kolofonija: Ekstra tvrdo; Ekstra meko; Tvrdo; Srednje; Meko; Ostalo
es: Dureza de la resina: Extradura; Extrablanda; Dura; Media; Blanda; Otro
pt-PT: Dureza da resina: Extraduro; Extramacio; Duro; Médio; Macio; Outro
da: Harpikshårdhed: Ekstrahård; Ekstrablød; Hård; Medium; Blød; Andet
sv: Rosinhårdhet: Extra hård; Extra mjuk; Hård; Medium; Mjuk; Övrigt
ru: Твердость канифоли: Экстратвердая; Экстрамягкая; Твердая; Средняя; Мягкая; Другое
nl: Hars hardheid: Extra hard; Extra zacht; Hard; Medium; Zacht; Overige
ja: ロジン硬度: エクストラハード; エクストラソフト; ハード; ミディアム; ソフト; その他
pl: Twardość kalafonii: Bardzo twarda; Bardzo miękka; Twarda; Średnia; Miękka; Inna
tr: Reçine sertliği: Ekstra sert; Ekstra yumuşak; Sert; Orta; Yumuşak; Diğer
el: Σκληρότητα κολοφωνίου: Πολύ σκληρή; Πολύ μαλακή; Σκληρή; Μεσαία; Μαλακή; Άλλο
fi: Hartsin kovuus: Erittäin kova; Erittäin pehmeä; Kova; Keskikova; Pehmeä; Muu
cs: Tvrdost kalafuny: Extra tvrdá; Extra měkká; Tvrdá; Střední; Měkká; Jiné